Hawaii statutes.
[§39-164] Enforcement of a security
interest. The terms of any applicable authorizing statute shall govern the
enforcement of any security interest to the extent that the authorizing statute
contains express provisions relating to enforcement or authorizes a
governmental unit to contract with respect to enforcement. [L 2000, c 28, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next